Vermont, session 2025-2026, H57.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as “Jessica’s Law.”
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. chapter 181 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 181. BENEFITS FOR THE SURVIVORS OF EMERGENCY
PERSONNEL AND LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
§ 3171. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Emergency Personnel and Law Enforcement
Officers Survivors Benefit Review Board.
* * *
(4) “Line of duty” means:
(A) answering or returning from With respect to emergency
personnel:
(i) service in answer to a call of the department or service for a
fire or emergency or, including going to and returning from a fire or
emergency or participating in a fire or emergency training drill; or
(B)(ii) similar service in another town or district to which the
department or service has been called for firefighting or emergency purposes.
(B) With respect to law enforcement officers:
VT LEG #379262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.57
2025 Page 3 of 6
(i) service as a law enforcement officer in answer to a complaint
lodged with the department or in response to a disorder, including going to,
returning from, and investigating or responding to the complaint or disorder; or
(ii) service under orders from the department or in any emergency
for which the law enforcement officer serves as a law enforcement officer.
* * *
(7) “Survivor” means a spouse, child, or parent of emergency personnel
or a law enforcement officer.
(8) “Law enforcement officer” means a law enforcement officer who
has been certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to section
2358 of this title.
§ 3172. EMERGENCY PERSONNEL AND LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS SURVIVORS BENEFIT REVIEW BOARD
(a)(1) There is created the Emergency Personnel and Law Enforcement
Officers Survivors Benefit Review Board, which shall consist of the State
Treasurer or designee, the Attorney General or designee, the Chief Fire Service
Training Officer of the Vermont Fire Service Training Council or designee,
and the Executive Director of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council or
designee, one member of the public to represent the interests of emergency
personnel appointed by the Governor for a term of two years, and one member
of the public to represent the interests of law enforcement officers. The
VT LEG #379262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.57
2025 Page 4 of 6
members of the public shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of two
years.
(2) Survivors of emergency personnel, employed by or who volunteer
for the State of Vermont, a county or municipality of the State, or a nonprofit
entity that provides services in the State, the following individuals who die in
the line of duty or of an occupation-related illness may request the Board
award a monetary benefit under section 3173 of this title:
(A) emergency personnel, employed by or who volunteer for the
State of Vermont, a county or municipality of the State, or a nonprofit entity
that provides access to services in the State; and
(B) law enforcement officers.
(3) The Board shall be responsible for determining whether to award
monetary benefits under section 3173 of this title. A decision to award
monetary benefits shall be made by unanimous vote of the Board and shall be
made within 60 days after the receipt of all information necessary to enable the
Board to determine eligibility.
(4) The Board may request any information necessary for the exercise of
its duties under this section. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Board
from initiating the investigation or determination of a claim before being
requested by a survivor or employer of emergency personnel or a law
enforcement officer.
VT LEG #379262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.57
2025 Page 5 of 6
* * *
(c) If the Board decides to award a monetary benefit, the benefit shall be
paid to the surviving spouse or, if the emergency personnel or law enforcement
officer had no spouse at the time of death, to the surviving child, or equally
among surviving children. If the deceased emergency personnel or law
enforcement officer is not survived by a spouse or child, the benefit shall be
paid to a surviving parent, or equally between surviving parents. If the
deceased emergency personnel or law enforcement officer is not survived by a
spouse, children, or parents, the Board shall not award a monetary benefit
under this chapter.
* * *
(f) The Each member of the public appointed by the Governor shall be
entitled to per diem compensation authorized under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for each
day spent in the performance of his or her the member’s duties.
§ 3173. MONETARY BENEFIT
(a) The survivors of emergency personnel or a law enforcement officer who
dies while in the line of duty or from an occupation-related illness may apply
for a payment of $80,000.00 from the State.
* * *
§ 3175. EMERGENCY PERSONNEL AND LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS SURVIVORS BENEFIT SPECIAL FUND
VT LEG #379262 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.57
2025 Page 6 of 6
(a) The Emergency Personnel and Law Enforcement Officers Survivors
Benefit Special Fund is established in the Office of the State Treasurer for the
purpose of the payment of claims distributed pursuant to this chapter. The
Fund shall comprise appropriations made by the General Assembly and
contributions or donations from any other source. All balances in the Fund at
the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward. Interest earned shall remain
in the Fund.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379262 v.1